Illinois, session 104th, SB1033.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 1-100 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/1-100)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-100)8    Sec. 1-100. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 9the "Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code".10(Source: P.A. 80-1414.)